Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1270.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 6, 1951 (P.L.69, No.20), known as The Landlord and Tenant Act of 1951, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 207. Parking Provisions in Lease.--(a) (1) A landlord shall state in a lease whether parking is provided for a tenant. If the landlord provides parking to the tenant, the landlord shall state in the lease whether the tenant is required to pay a fee for the provision of parking and, if so, the amount of the fee.(2) A landlord may not change or add a fee associated with the provision of parking for the duration of a lease with a 1234567891011121314151617181920 tenant.(b) A tenant may file a complaint with a lower court if a violation of subsection (a) occurs.(c) If the lower court determines that a landlord violated subsection (a), the landlord shall be required to pay parking costs incurred by the tenant for the duration of the lease, as determined by the lower court.(d) As used in this section, the term "lower court" shall mean a district justice, magistrate or any other court having jurisdiction over landlord and tenant matters. The term does not include a court of common pleas.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1270PN1583 - 2 - 123456789101112